apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="/sus__pr">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>sus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>mieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>mieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>tieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>tieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>sieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>sieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>nòstre</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>nòstres</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>vòstres</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>vòstre</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>mieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>mieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>tieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>tieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>sieus</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>sieu</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>nòstre</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>nòstres</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>suls<b/>vòstres</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sul<b/>vòstre</l> 
        <r>sus<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/jos__pr">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jos</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>jos</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>mieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>mieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>tieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>tieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>sieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>sieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>nòstre</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>nòstres</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>vòstres</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>vòstre</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>mieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>mieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>mieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>tieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>tieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>tieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>sieus</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>sieu</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>sieu<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>nòstre</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>nòstres</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>nòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jols<b/>vòstres</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>jol<b/>vòstre</l> 
        <r>jos<s n="pr"/><j/>lo<b/>vòstre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="jos">
        <i></i> 
        <par n="/jos__pr"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sus">
        <i></i> 
        <par n="/sus__pr"/> 
    </e>
